Hawaii statutes.
§302A-447 State student council. (a)
There is established within the department for administrative purposes the
state student council, which shall consist of representation from each
departmental school district.

(b) The council shall determine whether it
shall directly select the student representative to the board or whether it
shall run an election to select that individual.

(c) The council shall establish policies and
procedures governing its operations, including the selection and number of council
members, without regard to the public notice, public hearing, and gubernatorial
approval requirements of chapter 91, but subject to the open meeting
requirements of chapter 92.

(d) The state student council shall cooperate
with the student conference committee established under section 317-2 in
planning the annual secondary school students conference established under
chapter 317. [L 2002, c 172, §2; am L 2011, c 5, §13]

Revision Note

Throughout this section, "state student council"
substituted for "Hawaii state student council".

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next